src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Evenki morphological analyser                      

## Tags

### Parts of speech
* +A	     = 
* +Adv     = 
* +V	     = 
* +Pron    = 
* +Pers    = 
* +Poss    = 
* +Refl    = 
* +N       = Noun
* +Num     = Numeral
* +Prop    = 
* +Det    = 
* +Interr    = 
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©

* +Sg      = Singular
* +Pl      = Plural

### Cases
* +Acc    = Винительный Accusative
* +Dat    = Дателный Dative
* +Loc    = Местный Locative
* +All    = Направителый Allative
* +Prl    = Продольный Prolative
* +Ter    = Направительно-местный Terminative
* +Dir    = Направительно-продольный Directive
* +Abl    = Отложительный Ablative
* +Ela    = Исходный Elative
* +Ins    = Творительный Instrumental
* +Com    = Совместный Comitative

* +Ind     = Винительный-неопределёний Indefinite Accusative
* +Def     = ва definite acc

### Possessives
* +PxSg1   = 
* +PxSg2   = 
* +PxSg3   = 
* +PxPl1   = 
* +PxPl12  = 
* +PxPl2   = 
* +PxPl3   = 

## Verbal forms

* +Inf    = 
* +IV    = 
* +TV    = 

* +Ind    = 
* +Imp    = 
* +Neg    = 

* +Prs    = 
* +Prt    = 
* +Hab    = 
* +Fut1    = 
* +Fut2    = 
* +Fut3    = 
* +Iter    = 

* +Sg1   = 
* +Sg2   = 
* +Sg3   = 
* +Pl1   = 
* +Pl12  = 
* +Pl2   = 
* +Pl3   = 

* +PUNCT    = 
* +CLB    = 
* +RIGHT +MIDDLE  = 
* +LEFT    = 

* **«7**:  Literal «
* **»7**:  Literal «

* %{j%}   =  -и -ø
* %{i%}   =  -и -ø
* %{A%}   =  -а -э -о
* %{L%}   =  -л -р -н
* %{D%}   =  -д -т
* %{V%}   =  -в -м
* %{R%}   =  -р, 0
* %{G%}   =  -г -к -ӈ
* %{Я%}   = 
* %{U%}   = -у-, -и-
* %{ː%}   = long vowel (lexc lower side)
* %>      =  

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-evn/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
